California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) The lead agency shall consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife to ensure that, to the extent feasible, the project is designed to avoid or minimize impacts to (A) candidate, rare, threatened, endangered plants and wildlife; and (B) wildlife nursery sites, including nesting rookeries, spawning areas, fawning areas, and maternal roosts.

(3) The lead agency shall, to the extent feasible, design the project to avoid impacts to riparian areas and water quality through use of sediment and erosion control measures where there is ground disturbance for control lines.

(4) The lead agency shall identify and, to the extent feasible, protect tribal cultural resources that may be impacted by project. This paragraph may be met by reviewing existing records, including the
 California Historical Resources Information System and Sacred Lands Inventory, or by engaging in consultation with relevant California Native American tribes on identification of tribal cultural resources and appropriate mitigation measures while maintaining confidentiality of sensitive records.

(b) A project consisting of “defensible space” fire clearance of up to 100 feet, as measured from the center line of the roadway, for a public roadway identified as an egress and evacuation route for a subdivision or community of 30 or more dwelling units, to remove flammable vegetation or trees of less than 12 inches in diameter as measured at chest height.

(c) A project consisting of the establishment or enhancement of residential home hardening or defensible space for wildfire risk reduction within 200 feet of a legal structure located in a high or very high wildfire hazard zone.

(d) A project consisting of a fuel break that extends up to 200 feet from structures, including the clearance of flammable vegetation and trees less than 12 inches in diameter as measured at chest height.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 11.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.50.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Interim motel housing project” or “project” means the conversion of a structure with a certificate of occupancy as a motel, hotel, residential hotel, or hostel to supportive or transitional housing, and the conversion meets one or both of the following conditions:

(A) It does not result in the expansion of more than 10 percent of the floor area of any individual living unit in the structure.

(B) It does not result in any significant effects relating to traffic, noise, air quality, or water
 quality.

(2) “Residential hotel” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Supportive housing” means housing linked to onsite or offsite supportive services and with no limit on length of stay for persons with low incomes who have one or more disabilities and may include, among other populations, adults, emancipated minors, families with children, elderly persons, young adults aging out of the foster care system, individuals exiting from institutional settings, veterans, and homeless people.

(4) “Supportive services” means services that are provided on a voluntary basis to residents of supportive or transitional housing, including, but not limited to, a combination of subsidized
 and permanent housing services, intensive case management, medical and mental health care, substance abuse treatment, employment services, benefits advocacy, and other services or service referrals necessary to obtain and maintain housing.

(5) “Transitional housing” means temporary housing linked to supportive services that is offered, usually for a period of up to 24 months, to facilitate movement to permanent housing for persons with low incomes who may have one or more disabilities, and may include, among other populations, adults, emancipated minors, families with children, elderly persons, young adults aging out of the foster care system, individuals exiting from institutional settings, veterans, and homeless people.

(b) This division does not apply to an interim motel
 housing project.

(c) A lead agency that determines an interim motel housing project is exempt pursuant to this section shall file a notice of exemption in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 21152 with the Office of Planning and Research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   (SB 91)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.51.

(a) This division does not apply to a project undertaken by any entity, including a public entity or private or nonprofit corporation, that consists of linear broadband deployment in a right-of-way, including a right-of-way of a local street or road, if the project meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The project is constructed along, or within 30-feet of, the right-of-way of any public road or highway.

(2) The project is either deployed underground where the surface area is restored to a condition existing before the project or placed aerially along an existing utility pole right-of-way.

(3) The project incorporates, as a condition of project approval, measures developed by the Public Utilities Commission, the Department of Transportation, or the city, county, or city and county responsible for the right-of-way
 to address potential environmental impacts. At minimum, the project shall be required to include monitors during construction activities and measures to avoid or address impacts to cultural and biological resources.

(4) The project applicant agrees to comply with all conditions otherwise authorized by law, imposed by a city, county, or city and county
 as part of a local agency permit process, that are required to mitigate potential impacts of the proposed project, and to comply with the Keene-Nejedly California Wetlands Preservation Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5810) of Division 5), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), as applicable, other applicable state laws, and all applicable federal laws.

(b) If a project meets all of the requirements of subdivision (a), the person undertaking the project shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify, in writing, any affected public agency, including, but not limited to, any public agency having permit, land use, environmental, public health protection, or emergency response authority, of the exemption of the project pursuant to this section.

(2) Provide notice to the public in the area affected by the project in a manner consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 21108.

(3) In the case of private rights-of-way over private property, receive from the underlying property owner permission for access to the property.

(4) Comply with all conditions authorized by law imposed by a city, county, or city and county as part of any local agency permit process, that are required to mitigate potential impacts of the proposed project, and otherwise comply with the Keene-Nejedly California Wetlands Preservation Act (Chapter 7 (commencing
 with Section 5810) of Division 5), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), as applicable, other applicable state laws, and all applicable federal laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 12.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.55.

This division does not apply to updates to the state’s climate adaptation strategy, known as the plan, adopted by the Natural Resources Agency pursuant to Section 71153.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 13.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.56.

(a) This division does not apply to a project that is exclusively one of the following:

(1) A project to conserve, restore, protect, or enhance, and assist in the recovery of California native fish and wildlife, and the habitat upon which they depend.

(2) A project to restore or provide habitat for California native fish and wildlife.

(b) An eligible project may have incidental public benefits, such as public access and recreation.

(c) This section does not apply to a project unless the project does both of the following:

(1) Results in long-term net benefits to climate resiliency, biodiversity, and sensitive species recovery.

(2) Includes procedures and ongoing management for the protection of the environment.

(d) This section does not apply to a project that includes construction activities, except for construction activities solely related to habitat restoration.

(e) The lead agency shall obtain the concurrence of the Director of Fish and Wildlife for the determinations required pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive. The director shall document the director’s concurrence using substantial evidence and best available science.

(f) The project shall remain subject to all other applicable federal, state,
 and local laws and regulations, and shall not weaken or violate any applicable environmental or public health standards.

(g) Within 48 hours of making a determination that a project is exempt pursuant to this section, a lead agency shall file a notice described in subdivision (b) of Section 21108 or subdivision (b) of Section 21152 with the Office of Planning and Research, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall post the concurrence of the Director of Fish and Wildlife on the department’s internet website.

(h) The Natural Resources Agency shall, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, report annually to the Legislature all determinations pursuant to this section.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 74, Sec. 6.   (SB 174)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.57.

This division does not apply to any activity or approval necessary for or incidental to planning, design, site acquisition, construction, operation, or maintenance of public park or nonmotorized recreational trail facilities funded in whole or in part by the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Bond Act of 2024 (Division 50 (commencing with Section 90000)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 14.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.58.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Faculty and staff housing project” means one or more housing facilities to be occupied by faculty or staff of one or more campuses, and owned by a public university, including dining, academic, and faculty and staff support service spaces and other necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment.

(2) “Public university” means the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(3) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of
 Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(4) “Student housing project” means one or more housing facilities to be occupied by students of one or more campuses and owned by a public university, including dining, academic and student support service spaces, and other necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment.

(5) “University housing development project” or “project” means a student housing project or a faculty and staff housing project that is not located, in whole or in part, on a site that is any of the following:

(A) Either prime farmland or farmland of statewide importance, as defined pursuant to United States Department of Agriculture land inventory and monitoring criteria, as modified for California, and designated on the maps prepared by the Farmland Mapping and Monitoring Program of the
 Department of Conservation, or land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation by a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction.

(B) Wetlands, as defined in the United States Fish and Wildlife Service Manual, Part 660 FW 2 (June 21, 1993).

(C) Within a very high fire hazard severity zone, as determined by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or within a high or very high fire hazard severity zone as indicated on maps adopted by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 4202. This subparagraph does not apply to sites that have adopted fire hazard mitigation measures pursuant to existing building standards or state fire mitigation measures applicable to the project.

(D) Either a hazardous waste site listed pursuant to Section
 65962.5 of the Government Code or a hazardous substances release site designated by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code, unless the State Department of Public Health, State Water Resources Control Board, or Department of Toxic Substances Control has cleared the site for residential use or residential mixed uses.

(E) Within a delineated earthquake fault zone as determined by the State Geologist in any official maps published by the State Geologist, unless the project complies with applicable seismic protection building code standards adopted by the California Building Standards Commission under the California Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), and by any local building department under Chapter 12.2 (commencing with Section 8875) of Division 1
 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(F) Within a special flood hazard area subject to inundation by a 1 percent annual chance flood (100-year flood) as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. If a public university is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to demonstrate that the site satisfies this subparagraph and is otherwise eligible to be exempt from this division pursuant to this section, a local government shall not deny an application on the basis that the public university did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site. A project may be located on a site described in this subparagraph if either of the following are met:

(i) The site has been subject to a Letter of
 Map Revision prepared by the Federal Emergency Management Agency and issued to the local government.

(ii) The site meets Federal Emergency Management Agency requirements necessary to meet minimum flood plain management criteria of the National Flood Insurance Program pursuant to Part 59 (commencing with Section 59.1) and Part 60 (commencing with Section 60.1) of Subchapter B of Chapter I of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(G) Within a regulatory floodway as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in any official maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the project has received a no-rise certification in accordance with Section 60.3(d)(3) of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations. If a public university is able to satisfy all applicable federal qualifying criteria in order to demonstrate that the site satisfies this
 subparagraph and is otherwise eligible to be exempt from this division pursuant to this section, a local government shall not deny an application on the basis that the public university did not comply with any additional permit requirement, standard, or action adopted by that local government that is applicable to that site.

(H) Lands identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other adopted natural resource protection plan.

(I) Habitat for protected species identified as candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by a state or federal agency, fully protected species, or species
 protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).

(J) Lands under conservation easement.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), this division does not apply to a university housing development project carried out by a public university on real property owned by the public university that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) (i) If the university housing development project is carried out by the University of California, the university housing development project is located on a
 campus site identified for housing in the most recent long-range development plan environmental impact report or the environmental impact report prepared for any subsequent amendment to the most recent long-range development plan relating to housing.

(ii) If the most recent environmental impact report identifies a range of housing units or beds for the project site, the number of housing units or beds is within the range of housing units or beds analyzed for that site.

(iii) If the most recent environmental impact report does not identify a range of housing units or beds for specific sites, the project does not result in the total additional campus housing units or beds exceeding the number of additional units or beds analyzed in that environmental impact report.

(B) If the university housing development project is
 carried out by the California State University or the California Community Colleges, the university housing development project is consistent with the most recent master plan environmental impact report prepared pursuant to Section 21080.09 and certified no more than 10 years before the determination that the exemption under this section applies and with any applicable tiered environmental analysis, so long as none of the events specified in Section 21166 have occurred.

(2) Each building within the university housing development project meets the minimum requirements to qualify for certification as Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) Platinum or better by the United States Green Building Council.

(3) (A) No more than one-third of the project square footage shall be used for dining, academic, parking, or student support service spaces, or
 other necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment.

(B) For faculty and staff housing projects, and student housing projects occupied by more than two-thirds graduate students, no more than 12 percent of total project square footage shall be used for parking facilities.

(C) For student housing projects occupied by more than two-thirds undergraduate students, no more than 5 percent of total project square footage shall be used for parking.

(4) The project is within one-half mile of a major transit stop or one-half mile of the campus boundary, as defined by the public university’s long-range development plan or master plan, as appropriate, or would not exceed the vehicle miles traveled screening threshold of 110 trips per day as stated in the Office of Planning and Research April 2018 publication
 entitled “Technical Advisory on Evaluating Transportation Impacts in CEQA,” or has 15 percent lower per capita vehicle miles traveled as compared to that for the jurisdiction in which the university housing development project is located.

(5) The project has a transportation demand management program.

(6) The project’s construction impacts are fully mitigated consistent with any applicable local, state, or federal law, except that for purposes of this paragraph, applicable law shall not include this division.

(7) (A) The project would not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, as supported by substantial evidence.

(B) To maximize public health and environmental benefits, the public university shall ensure that
 the measures will reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases in the project area and in the neighboring communities.

(C) Not less than 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirement of this paragraph shall be from local, direct greenhouse gas emissions reduction measures, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Project design features or onsite reduction measures, or both design features and onsite reduction measures, that include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Implementing project design features that enable the project to exceed the building energy efficiency standards set forth in Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, not including 50 percent of emissions reductions attributable to
 design features necessary to qualify for LEED Platinum certification.

(II) Requiring a transportation demand management program to reduce single-occupancy vehicular travel and vehicle miles traveled.

(III) Providing onsite renewable energy generation, including a solar roof on the project with a minimum peak generation capacity of 500 kilowatts.

(IV) Providing solar-ready roofs.

(V) Providing cool roofs and cool parking promoting cool surface treatment for new parking facilities.

(ii) Offsite reduction measures in neighboring communities, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Providing funding to an offsite
 mitigation project consisting of replacing buses, trolleys, or other transit vehicles with zero-emission vehicles.

(II) Providing offsite safety or other improvements for bicycles, pedestrians, and transit connections.

(III) Undertaking or funding building retrofits to improve the energy efficiency of existing buildings.

(D) (i) The public university may obtain offset credits for up to 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirement of this subdivision that produce emissions reductions within the jurisdiction that the university housing development project is located. Any offset credits shall be verified by a third party accredited by the State Air Resources Board, and shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing with
 Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the requirement that the offset be real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable, and enforceable, and shall be undertaken from sources in the same community in which the project is located or adjacent communities.

(ii) If 50 percent of greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve no additional emissions of greenhouse gases cannot be feasibly and fully mitigated by offset credits as described in clause (i), the mitigation of the remaining emissions of greenhouse gases shall be achieved pursuant to the following priority:

(I) Offset credits that would also reduce the emissions of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants. The offsets shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the
 requirement that the offsets be real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable, and enforceable, and shall be undertaken from sources in the community within which the project is located or in adjacent communities.

(II) If the remaining emissions of greenhouse gases cannot be feasibly or fully mitigated by the offsets credits described in subclause (I), the remaining unmitigated greenhouse gas emissions shall be mitigated through the use of offsets that would also reduce emissions of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants and shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with subclause (I) and shall be undertaken from sources that provide a specific, quantifiable, and direct environmental and public health benefit to the community in which the project is located.

(E) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this paragraph, to maximize the environmental and public health
 benefits from measures to mitigate the emissions of greenhouse gases of a university housing development project to those people that are impacted most by the project.

(8) All contractors and subcontractors at every tier on the project will be required to pay prevailing wages in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(9) (A) An entity shall not be prequalified or shortlisted or awarded a contract to perform work on the project unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the public university that the entity and its contractors and subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of
 Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(B) This paragraph does not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(i) The public university has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing work on the project to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(ii) The project is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the public university before January 1, 2023.

(iii) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all of its contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing the project to use a skilled and
 trained workforce.

(10) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for a project carried out by the University of California, all cleaning, maintenance, groundskeeping, food service, or other work traditionally performed by persons with University of California Service Unit (SX) job classifications shall be performed only by employees of the University of California at any facility, building, property, or space that is part of the project.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply to, and shall not restrict the performance of, work done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of public funds when the work is either of the following:

(i) Construction, alteration, demolition, installation, cleanup work at the construction jobsite, or repair work, including work performed during the design
 and all phases of construction, including preconstruction and postconstruction phases.

(ii) Carpentry, electrical, plumbing, glazing, painting, and other craftwork designed to preserve, protect, or keep a publicly owned facility in a safe and continuously usable condition, including repairs, cleaning, and other operations on machinery and other equipment permanently attached to the building or real property as fixtures.

(11) (A) The public university holds at least one noticed public hearing in the project area to receive all public comment before determining that a university housing development project is exempt pursuant to this section.

(B) The public university shall give public notice of the meeting to the last known name and address of all the organizations and individuals that have
 previously requested notice and shall also give the general public notice using at least one of the following procedures:

(i) Publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the project. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.

(ii) Posting of the notice onsite and offsite in the area where the project is located.

(iii) Posting of the notice on the public university’s internet website and social media accounts.

(12) The public university files a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, of Section 21108.

(c) (1) (A) A public university shall obtain LEED Platinum certification for each building within an approved university housing development project that is exempt from this division pursuant to subdivision (b) no later than 18 months from the issuance of the building’s certificate of occupancy or an equivalent certification, or its initial usage.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a public university that has completed all actions the public university believes are necessary to obtain LEED Platinum certification for each building within the university housing development project within the 18-month timeframe described in subparagraph (A), but that has not obtained LEED Platinum certification for each building within that university housing development project within that 18-month timeframe due to circumstances outside of the control of
 the public university, may, after making a public notice and a disclosure to the Office of Planning and Research of the reasons that LEED Platinum certification has not been obtained, obtain LEED Platinum certification as required by subparagraph (A) within an additional six months. A public university may obtain one additional six-month extension by making a public notice and a disclosure to the Office of Planning and Research of the reasons that LEED Platinum certification has not been obtained, as long as the circumstances outside of the control of the public university persist.

(C) For purposes of subparagraph (B), circumstances outside of the control of the public university include, but are not limited to, an unreasonable delay in obtaining LEED certification that is the fault of the certifying organization and any force majeure event that includes, but is not limited to, any strike, factory closure, explosion, maritime peril, natural
 disaster, pandemic, act of a public enemy, fire, flood, accident, war, riot, insurgence, or other similar event.

(2) (A) A public university that has approved a university housing development project that is exempt from this division pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not exempt a subsequent university housing development project pursuant to subdivision (b) until the public university has obtained LEED Platinum certification for each building within the prior university housing development project exempted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a public university that has authorized funding for preliminary plans or a schematic design, or both, for a subsequent public university housing project before the date that a prior public university housing project is noncompliant with paragraph (1) may exempt the subsequent public
 university housing project pursuant to subdivision (b), if the campus where the subsequent project is located does not have more than two approved projects that were exempt from this division pursuant to subdivision (b) with one or more buildings that have not received LEED Platinum certification within the timeframe permitted by paragraph (1).

(3) The lead agency shall file the LEED certification described in paragraph (1) along with a determination that the construction impacts of the project have been fully mitigated as required pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) with the Office of Planning and Research.

(d) The exemption from this division provided by subdivision (b) does not apply to a university housing development project that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The project would require the
 demolition of any of the following:

(A) Housing that is subject to a recorded covenant, ordinance, or law that restricts rents to levels affordable to persons and families of moderate, low, or very low income.

(B) Housing that is subject to any form of rent or price control through a public entity’s valid exercise of its police power.

(C) Housing that has been occupied by tenants within the past 10 years, except an existing university student housing project.

(D) A historic structure that is listed on a national, state, or local historic register.

(2) The project is located on a site that was previously used for housing that was occupied by tenants and was demolished within 10 years before
 the public university files a notice of exemption or submits an application under this section, whichever occurs sooner.

(3) The project is located on a site that contains housing units that are occupied by tenants and the housing units are offered for sale, or were subsequently offered for sale, to the general public by a subdivider or subsequent owner of the site.

(4) The project consists of more than 2,000 units or 4,000 beds.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.   (SB 312)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.61.

(a) This division does not apply to routine maintenance of public stormwater facilities that are fully concrete or have a conveyance capacity of less than a 100-year storm event if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The project does not increase the designed conveyance capacity of the stormwater facility.

(2) The project is undertaken or approved by a public agency that has adopted, by ordinance, procedures that apply to the project to minimize the impacts of construction equipment, debris, sediment, and other pollutants.

(3) The project is not likely to result in adverse impacts to tribal cultural
 resources.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 21151, a determination that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section shall not be eligible for appeal to the agency’s elected decisionmaking body if the project is approved by the nonelected decisionmaking body of a city with a population of at least 1,000,000.

(c) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section and it determines to approve or carry out the project, the lead agency shall file a notice with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk in the county in which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21152.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only
 until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   (AB 3227)   Effective September 27, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.62.

(a) This division does not apply to any activity or approval necessary for the completion of the public and state veterans cemetery in Gypsum Canyon in the County of Orange, known as the Gypsum Canyon Veterans Cemetery if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The public and state veterans cemetery in Gypsum Canyon is a less intensive land use than the project analyzed in the 2005 certified environmental impact report Mountain Park
 Specific Plan Amendment.

(2) The Gypsum Canyon Cemetery Project Development Project No. 2020-00204 Addendum to the 2005 Certified Environmental Impact Report No. 331 analyzed the impacts of the public and state veterans cemetery in Gypsum Canyon.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.   (AB 571)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provision.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.66.

(a) Without limiting any other statutory or categorical exemption, this division does not apply to any aspect of a housing development project, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 65905.5 of the Government Code, including any permits, approvals, or public improvements required for the housing development project, as may be required by this division, if the housing development project meets all of the following conditions:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the project site is not more than 20 acres.

(B) The project site or the parcel size for a builder’s remedy project, as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government
 Code, or the project site or the parcel size for a project that applied pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code as it read before January 1, 2025, is not more than four acres.

(2) The project site meets either of the following criteria:

(A) Is located within the boundaries of an incorporated municipality.

(B) Is located within an urban area, as defined by the United States Census Bureau.

(3) The project site meets any of the following criteria:

(A) Has been previously developed with an urban use.

(B) At least 75 percent of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed with urban uses.

(C) At least 75 percent of the area within a one-quarter mile radius of the site is developed with urban uses.

(D) For sites with four sides, at least three out of four sides are developed with urban uses and at least two-thirds of the perimeter of the site adjoins parcels that are developed with urban uses.

(4) (A) The project is consistent with the applicable general plan and zoning ordinance, as well as any applicable local coastal program as defined in Section 30108.6. For purposes of this section, a housing development project shall be deemed consistent with the applicable general plan and zoning ordinance, and any applicable local coastal program, if there is substantial evidence that would allow a reasonable person to conclude that the housing development project is consistent.

(B) If the zoning and general plan are not consistent with one another, a project shall be deemed consistent with both if the project is consistent with one.

(C) The approval of a density bonus, incentives or concessions, waivers or reductions of development standards, and reduced parking ratios pursuant to Section 65915 of the Government Code shall not be grounds for determining that the project is inconsistent with the applicable general plan, zoning ordinance, or local coastal program.

(5) The project will be at least one-half of the applicable density specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 65583.2 of the Government Code.

(6) The project satisfies the requirements specified in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of
 Section 65913.4 of the Government Code.

(7) The project does not require the demolition of a historic structure that was placed on a national, state, or local historic register before the date a preliminary application was submitted for the project pursuant to Section 65941.1 of the Government Code.

(8) For a project that was deemed complete pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code on or after January 1, 2025, no portion of the project is designated for use as a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other transient lodging. For the purposes of this section, “other transient lodging” does not include either of the following:
